New York, session 2025-2026, S8744.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "age- 2 friendly health system enhancement act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 206 of the public health law is amended 4 by adding a new paragraph (x) to read as follows: 5 (x) establish, in conjunction with the office for the aging, a center 6 for technical assistance in relation to age-friendly health systems. 7 § 3. The section heading of section 2995-b of the public health law, 8 as added by chapter 542 of the laws of 2000, is amended and a new subdi- 9 vision 4 is added to read as follows: 10 Hospital [report cards] performance data. 11 4. Special designations. Using criteria developed from data collected 12 pursuant to this section and other criteria, the department shall desig- 13 nate hospitals that are well equipped in terms of expertise and technol- 14 ogy to provide certain types of care including stroke centers, trauma 15 centers, regional perinatal centers, burn centers, sexual assault foren- 16 sic examiner (SAFE) programs and age-friendly designated hospitals. 17 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05181-06-5